District of Columbia statutes.
38-454

Repealed

Reporting requirement.

Repealed.

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 705, 54 DCR 4102
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(b), 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(b) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).